Utah statutes.
76-10-525.   Disposition of weapons after use for court purposes.
All police departments and/or sheriff's departments which have in their
possession a weapon after it has been used for court purposes shall determine
the true owner of the weapon and return it to him; however, if unable to
determine the true owner of the weapon, or if the true owner is the person
committing the crime for which the weapon was used as evidence, the department
shall confiscate it and it shall revert to that agency for their use and/or
disposal as the head of the department determines.
